Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 40. new text end new text begin Tip income. new text end new text begin (a) The amount of qualified tips allowed as a deduction under section 224 of the Internal Revenue Code is a subtraction. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding section 224, paragraph (h), of the Internal Revenue Code, the subtraction under this subdivision is allowed for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2028. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end